Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1079.01
Distribution location, defined.

Distribution location shall mean each place nursery stock is offered for sale or sold and shall also include all locations of a vehicle from which nursery stock is offered for sale or sold directly. Distribution location shall not include each location from which an order is made by a purchaser ordering by mail, telephone, or facsimile transmission but shall include the location where such orders are received within the state.

Laws 1993, LB 406, § 8.